Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 2. Public Employment Relations Act.

Administrative Code. —

For collective bargaining among public employees, see 8 AAC 97.

Sec. 23.40.070.
Declaration of policy.

The legislature finds that joint decision-making is the modern way of administering government.
If public employees have been granted the right to share in the decision-making process affecting wages and working conditions, they have become more responsive and better able to exchange ideas and information on operations with their administrators.
Accordingly, government is made more effective. The legislature further finds that the enactment of positive legislation establishing guidelines for public employment relations is the best way to harness and direct the energies of public employees eager to have a voice in determining their conditions of work, to provide a rational method for dealing with disputes and work stoppages, to strengthen the merit principle where civil service is in effect, and to maintain a favorable political and social environment.
The legislature declares that it is the public policy of the state to promote harmonious and cooperative relations between government and its employees and to protect the public by assuring effective and orderly operations of government.
These policies are to be effectuated by

recognizing the right of public employees to organize for the purpose of collective bargaining;

requiring public employers to negotiate with and enter into written agreements with employee organizations on matters of wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment;

maintaining merit-system principles among public employees.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Paragraph (2) of this section and AS

23.40.250

(9), standing alone, clearly would make both group life and health insurance benefits and retirement benefits subject to collective bargaining since they both are “fringe benefits.”
January 23, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.

Because health insurance deals with the economic interests of employees and does not deal with fundamental policy; because AS

39.30.090

, the group insurance statute, authorizes the Department of Administration to obtain “a policy or policies”; and because AS

39.30.090

does not specify what levels of coverage or benefits must be included in the policy (or policies) obtained, the issue of group life and health insurance benefits is negotiable under the Public Employment Relations Act (AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

).
January 23, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.

Given AS

39.35.120(b)

and AS

39.35.170

, which make inclusion in the public employees retirement system (AS

39.35.010

—

39.35.690

) [now AS

39.35.001

—

39.35.995

] a condition of employment for state employees and contributions to it mandatory, the conclusion is that the legislature intended the statutory provisions of the public employees retirement system to apply to all state employees, and benefits under the public employees retirement system may not be negotiated under the Public Employment Relations Act (AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

). January 23, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.40.075.
Items not subject to bargaining.

The parties may not negotiate terms contrary to the

reemployment rights for injured state employees under AS

39.25.158

;

reemployment rights of the organized militia under AS

26.05.075

;

authority of the Department of Health and Social Services under AS

47.27.035

to assign Alaska temporary assistance program participants to a work activity considered appropriate by the Department of Health and Social Services;

authority for agencies to create temporary positions under AS

47.27.055(c)

; or

provisions contained in a contract under AS

14.40.210(a)(4)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 77 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 107 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For self-insurance, see 8 AAC 46.

Sec. 23.40.080.
Rights of public employees.

Public employees may self-organize and form, join, or assist an organization to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and engage in concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Public Employment Relations Act confirms the right of public employees to join and assist labor organizations, choose their own union representatives, and to engage in collective bargaining. The Act also provides various mechanisms for resolution of employer and union or employee disputes. Thus, union representation and activity is not outside service and does not have to be reported. July 26, 2011 Op Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.40.090.
Collective bargaining unit.

The labor relations agency shall decide in each case, in order to assure to employees the fullest freedom in exercising the rights guaranteed by AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

, the unit appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining, based on such factors as community of interest, wages, hours, and other working conditions of the employees involved, the history of collective bargaining, and the desires of the employees.
Bargaining units shall be as large as is reasonable, and unnecessary fragmenting shall be avoided.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

Sec. 23.40.100.
Representatives and elections.

The labor relations agency shall investigate a petition if it is submitted in a manner prescribed by the labor relations agency and is

by an employee or group of employees or an organization acting in their behalf alleging that 30 percent of the employees of a proposed bargaining unit

want to be represented for collective bargaining by a labor or employee organization as exclusive representative, or

assert that the organization which has been certified or is currently being recognized by the public employer as bargaining representative is no longer the representative of the majority of employees in the bargaining unit; or

by the public employer alleging that one or more organizations have presented to it a claim to be recognized as a representative of a majority of employees in an appropriate unit.

If the labor relations agency has reasonable cause to believe that a question of representation exists, it shall provide for an appropriate hearing upon due notice. If the labor relations agency finds that there is a question of representation, it shall direct an election by secret ballot to determine whether or by which organization the employees desire to be represented and shall certify the results of the election. Nothing in this section prohibits the waiving of hearings by stipulation for the purpose of a consent election in conformity with the regulations of the labor relations agency or an election in a bargaining unit agreed upon by the parties. The labor relations agency shall determine who is eligible to vote in an election and shall establish rules governing the election. In an election in which none of the choices on the ballot receives a majority of the votes cast, a runoff election shall be conducted, the ballot providing for selection between the two choices receiving the largest and the second largest number of valid votes cast in the election. If an organization receives the majority of the votes cast in the election it shall be certified by the labor relations agency as exclusive representative of all the employees in the bargaining unit.

An election may not be held in a bargaining unit or in a subdivision of a bargaining unit if a valid election has been held within the preceding 12 months.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits recognition of an organization as the exclusive representative by a public agency by mutual consent.

An election may not be directed by the labor relations agency in a bargaining unit in which there is in force a valid collective bargaining agreement, except during a 90-day period preceding the expiration date. However, a collective bargaining agreement may not bar an election upon petition of persons in the bargaining unit but not parties to the agreement if more than three years have elapsed since the execution of the agreement or the last timely renewal, whichever was later.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Administration may comply with an order received from the labor relations agency directing the state, in its capacity as a public employer, to provide lists of all employees eligible to vote in a representation election held pursuant to AS

23.40.100

. July 1, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.40.110.
Unfair labor practices.

A public employer or an agent of a public employer may not

interfere with, restrain, or coerce an employee in the exercise of the employee’s rights guaranteed in AS

23.40.080

;

dominate or interfere with the formation, existence, or administration of an organization;

discriminate in regard to hire or tenure of employment or a term or condition of employment to encourage or discourage membership in an organization;

discharge or discriminate against an employee because the employee has signed or filed an affidavit, petition, or complaint or given testimony under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

;

refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with an organization which is the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit, including but not limited to the discussing of grievances with the exclusive representative.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits a public employer from making an agreement with an organization to require as a condition of employment

membership in the organization which represents the unit on or after the 30th day following the beginning of employment or on the effective date of the agreement, whichever is later; or

payment by the employee to the exclusive bargaining agent of a service fee to reimburse the exclusive bargaining agent for the expense of representing the members of the bargaining unit.

A labor or employee organization or its agents may not

restrain or coerce

an employee in the exercise of the rights guaranteed in AS

23.40.080

, or

a public employer in the selection of the employer’s representative for the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances;

refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with a public employer, if it has been designated in accordance with the provisions of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

as the exclusive representative of employees in an appropriate unit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1990 the word “with” was inserted after “interfere” in (a)(1) of this section to correct a manifest error of omission in ch. 113, SLA 1972.

Administrative Code. —

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For impasse, see 8 AAC 97, art. 3.

For right of nonassociation, see 8 AAC 97, art. 4.

Sec. 23.40.120.
Investigation and conciliation of complaints.

If a verified written complaint by or for a person claiming to be aggrieved by a practice prohibited by AS

23.40.110

, or a written accusation that a person subject to AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

has engaged in a prohibited practice, is filed with the labor relations agency, it shall investigate the complaint or accusation.
If it determines after the preliminary investigation that probable cause exists in support of the complaint or accusation, it shall try to eliminate the prohibited practice by informal methods of conference, conciliation, and persuasion. Nothing said or done during this endeavor may be used as evidence in a subsequent proceeding.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

Sec. 23.40.130.
Complaint and accusation.

If the labor relations agency fails to eliminate the prohibited practice by conciliation and to obtain voluntary compliance with AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

, or, before it attempts conciliation, it may serve a copy of the complaint or accusation upon the respondent.
The complaint or accusation and the subsequent procedures shall be handled in accordance with the administrative adjudication portion of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Sec. 23.40.140.
Orders and decisions.

If the labor relations agency finds that a person named in the written complaint or accusation has engaged in a prohibited practice, the labor relations agency shall issue and serve on the person an order or decision requiring the person to cease and desist from the prohibited practice and to take affirmative action which will carry out the provisions of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

.
If the labor relations agency finds that a person named in the complaint or accusation has not engaged or is not engaging in a prohibited practice, the labor relations agency shall state its findings of fact and issue an order dismissing the complaint or accusation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Sec. 23.40.150.
Enforcement by injunction.

The labor relations agency may apply to the superior court in the judicial district in which the prohibited practice occurred for an order enjoining the prohibited acts specified in the order or decision of the labor relations agency.
Upon a showing by the labor relations agency that the person has engaged or is about to engage in the practice, an injunction, restraining order, or other order which is appropriate may be granted by the court and shall be without bond.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Sec. 23.40.160.
Power to investigate and compel testimony.

For the purpose of the investigations, proceedings, or hearings which the labor relations agency considers necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

, the labor relations agency may issue subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of relevant evidence.

The labor relations agency may administer oaths, examine witnesses, and receive evidence.

The attendance of witnesses and the production of evidence may be required from any place in the state at any designated place of hearing.

If a person refuses to obey a subpoena issued under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

, the superior court in the district in which the person resides or is found may, upon application by the labor relations agency, issue an order requiring the person to comply with the subpoena.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

Sec. 23.40.170.
Regulations.

The labor relations agency may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the provisions of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For right of nonassociation, see 2 AAC 10, art. 4.

For certification, see 8 AAC 97, art. 1.

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For impasse, see 8 AAC 97, art. 3.

For right of nonassociation, see 8 AAC 97, art. 4.

For procedure for hearings, see 8 AAC 97, art. 5.

For collective bargaining agreement, see 8 AAC 97, art. 6.

Sec. 23.40.180.
Penalty for violation of order or decision.

A person who violates a provision of an order or decision of the labor relations agency is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Sec. 23.40.190.
Mediation.

If, after a reasonable period of negotiation over the terms of a collective bargaining agreement, a deadlock exists between a public employer and an organization, the labor relations agency may appoint a competent, impartial, disinterested person to act as mediator in any dispute either on its own initiative or on the request of one of the parties to the dispute.
The parties may also select a mediator by agreement or mutual consent.
It is the function of the mediator to bring the parties together voluntarily under such favorable auspices as will tend to effectuate settlement of the dispute, but neither the mediator nor the labor relations agency has any power of compulsion in mediation proceedings.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For impasse, see 8 AAC 97, art. 3.

Sec. 23.40.200.
Classes of public employees; arbitration.

For purposes of this section, public employees are employed to perform services in one of the three following classes:

those services which may not be given up for even the shortest period of time;

those services which may be interrupted for a limited period but not for an indefinite period of time; and

those services in which work stoppages may be sustained for extended periods without serious effects on the public.

The class in (a)(1) of this section is composed of police and fire protection employees, jail, prison, and other correctional institution employees, and hospital employees. Employees in this class may not engage in strikes. Upon a showing by a public employer or the labor relations agency that employees in this class are engaging or about to engage in a strike, an injunction, restraining order, or other order that may be appropriate shall be granted by the superior court in the judicial district in which the strike is occurring or is about to occur. If an impasse or deadlock is reached in collective bargaining between the public employer and employees in this class, and mediation has been utilized without resolving the deadlock, the parties shall submit to arbitration to be carried out under AS

09.43.030

or

09.43.480

to the extent permitted by AS

09.43.010

and

09.43.300

.

The class in (a)(2) of this section is composed of public utility, snow removal, sanitation, and educational institution employees other than employees of a school district, a regional educational attendance area, or a state boarding school. Employees in this class may engage in a strike after mediation, subject to the voting requirement of (d) of this section, for a limited time. The limit is determined by the interests of the health, safety, or welfare of the public. The public employer or the labor relations agency may apply to the superior court in the judicial district in which the strike is occurring for an order enjoining the strike. A strike may not be enjoined unless it can be shown that it has begun to threaten the health, safety, or welfare of the public. A court, in deciding whether or not to enjoin the strike, shall consider the total equities in the particular class. “Total equities” includes not only the effect of a strike on the public but also the extent to which employee organizations and public employers have met their statutory obligations. If an impasse or deadlock still exists after the issuance of an injunction, the parties shall submit to arbitration to be carried out under AS

09.43.030

or

09.43.480

to the extent permitted by AS

09.43.010

and

09.43.300

.

The class in (a)(3) of this section includes all other public employees who are not included in the classes in (a)(1) or (2) of this section. Subject to (g) of this section, employees in this class may engage in a strike if a majority of the employees in a collective bargaining unit vote by secret ballot to do so.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (b), (c) and (d) of this section, the employees with the concurrence of the employer may agree in writing to submit a dispute arising from interpretation or application of a collective bargaining agreement to arbitration.

The parties to a collective bargaining agreement may provide in the agreement a contract for arbitration to be conducted solely according to AS

09.43.010

—

09.43.180

(Uniform Arbitration Act) or AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

(Revised Uniform Arbitration Act) to the extent permitted by AS

09.43.010

and

09.43.300

if either Act is incorporated into the agreement or contract by reference.

Under the provisions of (d) of this section, if an impasse or deadlock is reached in collective bargaining negotiations between a municipal school district, a regional educational attendance area, or a state boarding school and its employees,

the parties shall submit to advisory arbitration before the employees may vote to engage in a strike; the arbitrator shall

be a member of the American Arbitration Association, Panel of Labor Arbitrators, or the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service;

have knowledge of and recent experience in the local conditions in the school district, regional educational attendance area, or state boarding school; and

be determined from a list containing at least five nominees who meet the qualifications of this subsection; this list shall be considered a complete list for the purpose of striking names and selecting the arbitrator;

if, under (1) of this subsection, advisory arbitration fails, a strike may not begin until at least 72 hours after notice of the strike is given to the other party; in any event, a strike may not begin on or after the first day of the school term, as that term is described in AS

14.03.030

, unless at least one day in session with students in attendance has passed after notice of the strike is given by the employees to the other party.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972; am §§ 3, 4 ch 1 SLA 1992; am §§ 17, 18 ch 113 SLA 1997; am §§ 1, 2 ch 130 SLA 2003; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 170 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For impasse, see 8 AAC 97, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Fish hatchery employees and area management biologists have a right to strike under paragraph (a)(3) and subsection (d). May 18, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.40.205.
Family leave.

Notwithstanding any provision of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

to the contrary, an agreement between the employer subject to AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

and an employee bargaining organization that does not contain benefit provisions at least as beneficial to the employee as those provided by AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

shall be considered to contain the benefit provisions of those statutes.

History.

(§ 7 ch 96 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

23.40.200(g)

.
Renumbered in 1992. In 2002, “AS

39.20.500

—

39.20.550

” was substituted for “AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

23.10.500

— 23.10.550.

Collateral references. —

Who is eligible employee under § 101(2) of Family and Medical Leave Act (29 U.S.C.A. § 2611(2)). 166 ALR Fed. 569.

Adequacy of notice to employer of need for leave under Federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993. 184 ALR Fed. 171.

Sec. 23.40.210.
Agreement; cost-of-living differential.

Upon the completion of negotiations between an organization and a public employer, if a settlement is reached, the employer shall reduce it to writing in the form of an agreement. The agreement may include a term for which it will remain in effect, not to exceed three years. The agreement shall include a pay plan designed to provide for a cost-of-living differential between the salaries paid employees residing in the state and employees residing outside the state. The plan shall provide that the salaries paid, as of August 26, 1977, to employees residing outside the state shall remain unchanged until the difference between those salaries and the salaries paid employees residing in the state reflects the difference between the cost of living in Alaska and living in Seattle, Washington. The agreement shall include a grievance procedure which shall have binding arbitration as its final step. Either party to the agreement has a right of action to enforce the agreement by petition to the labor relations agency.

An employee is eligible for the cost-of-living differential under (a) of this section only if the individual is a state resident. The required presence of an employee at a work station where room and board are provided or reimbursed by the employer may not be considered to be physical presence in the state or physical absence from the state for purposes of determining eligibility for the cost-of-living differential.

The commissioner of administration may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to clarify and implement the criteria for establishing and maintaining eligibility for the cost-of-living differential.

An agreement entered into under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

must require compliance with the eligibility criteria for receiving the cost-of-living differential contained in this section and the regulations adopted by the commissioner under (c) of this section.

In this section, “state resident” means an individual who is physically present in the state with the intent to remain permanently in the state under the requirements of AS

01.10.055

or, if the individual is not physically present in the state, intends to return to the state and remain permanently in the state under the requirements of AS

01.10.055

and is absent only temporarily for reasons allowed under AS

43.23.008

or a successor statute.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent and purpose related to the enactment of subsections (b)-(e), see § 1, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For unfair labor practices, see 8 AAC 97, art. 2.

For collective bargaining agreement, see 8 AAC 97, art. 6.

For receiving and processing complaints, see 21 AAC 20, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 4 FSSLA 1996 provides that nothing in that Act, which added subsections (b)-(e), “modifies or terminates the terms of a collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 1996.” Under § 45, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, the provisions of that act, which added subsections (b)-(e), are not severable, notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 23.40.212.
Agreement with the Board of Regents.

The Board of Regents of the University of Alaska may delegate to the Department of Administration its authority under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

to negotiate with an organization for an agreement.

The Department of Administration shall participate in the negotiations between the Board of Regents and an organization. An agreement between the board and an organization requires the approval of the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 148 SLA 1978)

Sec. 23.40.215.
Monetary terms subject to legislative funding.

The monetary terms of any agreement entered into under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

are subject to funding through legislative appropriation.

The Department of Administration shall submit the monetary terms of an agreement to the legislature within 10 legislative days after the agreement of the parties, if the legislature is in session, or within 10 legislative days after the convening of the next regular session. The complete monetary and nonmonetary terms of a tentative agreement shall be submitted to the legislature no later than the 60th day of the legislative session to receive legislative consideration during that calendar year. However, if the department has submitted a tentative agreement in a timely manner and the parties to the agreement decide to renegotiate the terms, the renegotiated agreement shall be considered to have been submitted in a timely manner. In this subsection, “tentative agreement” means an agreement that has been reached by the negotiators for the employer and the bargaining unit but that may not yet have been ratified by the members of the bargaining unit.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the monetary terms of an agreement entered into between a school district or regional educational attendance area and its employees are not required to be submitted to the legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1984; am § 5 ch 1 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 2000; am § 8 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Opinions of attorney general. —

To the extent the cost of negotiated group life and health insurance coverage exceeds what the State would have paid under its employer-sponsored plan, the negotiated coverage is subject to legislative approval under this section. January 23, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.40.220.
Labor or employee organization dues and employee benefits, deduction and authorization.

Upon written authorization of a public employee within a bargaining unit, the public employer shall deduct from the payroll of the public employee the monthly amount of dues, fees, and other employee benefits as certified by the secretary of the exclusive bargaining representative and shall deliver it to the chief fiscal officer of the exclusive bargaining representative.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Sec. 23.40.225.
Exemption based on religious convictions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

23.40.220

, a collective bargaining settlement reached, or agreement entered into, under AS

23.40.210

that incorporates union security provisions, including a union shop or agency shop provision or agreement, shall safeguard the rights of nonassociation of employees having bona fide religious convictions based on tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which an employee is a member. Upon submission of proper proof of religious conviction to the labor relations agency, the agency shall declare the employee exempt from becoming a member of a labor organization or employee association. The employee shall pay an amount of money equivalent to regular union or association dues, initiation fees, and assessments to the union or association. Nonpayment of this money subjects the employee to the same penalty as if it were nonpayment of dues. The receiving union or association shall contribute an equivalent amount of money to a charity of its choice not affiliated with a religious, labor, or employee organization. The union or association shall submit proof of contribution to the labor relations agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 85 SLA 1976; am § 23 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For right of nonassociation, see 2 AAC 10, art. 4.

For right of nonassociation, see 8 AAC 97, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in the first sentence, deleted “but not limited to” following “union security provisions, including”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 85, SLA 1976 provides: “If any portion of AS

23.40.225

is declared unconstitutional or void by a court of competent jurisdiction, then that entire section is void.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section does not supplant AS

18.80.220(a)

, a general provision against religious discrimination, nor does it violate the “establishment clause” of the Alaska Constitution where the non-associational rights of all public employees are secured by AS

18.80.220(a)

.
January 13, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

A state employee in a collective bargaining unit who does not belong to an organized religion is entitled to an accommodation of his religious opposition to the payment of union dues.
January 13, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 23.40.230.
Assistance by Department of Labor. [Repealed, E.O. No. 77 § 8 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 23.40.235.
Public involvement in school district negotiations.

Before beginning bargaining, the school board of a city or borough school district or a regional educational attendance area shall provide opportunities for public comment on the issues to be addressed in the collective bargaining process. Initial proposals, last-best-offer proposals, tentative agreements before ratification, and final agreements reached by the parties are public documents and are subject to inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 31 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 16, ch. 31, SLA 1996 provides that this section, added by ch. 31, SLA 1996, does not affect a collective bargaining agreement in effect on August 16, 1996.

Sec. 23.40.240.
Effect on certain units, representatives, and agreements.

Nothing in this chapter terminates or modifies a collective bargaining unit, recognition of exclusive bargaining representative, or collective bargaining agreement if the unit, recognition, or agreement is in effect on September 5, 1972.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Sec. 23.40.245.
Postsecondary student involvement in collective bargaining.

When a bargaining unit includes members of the faculty or other employees of a public institution of postsecondary education, the public employer and the representative of the bargaining unit shall permit student representatives of that institution to

attend and observe all meetings between the public employer and the representative of the bargaining unit which are involved with collective bargaining;

have access to all documents pertaining to collective bargaining exchanged by the employer and the representative of the bargaining unit, including copies of transcripts of the meetings.

Student representatives may not disclose information concerning the substance of collective bargaining obtained in the course of their activities under (a) of this section, unless that information is released by the employer or the representative of the bargaining unit.

For the purpose of this section, the students of the institution involved in negotiations shall select their representatives from the institution directly involved in negotiations.

When the institutions are negotiating with bargaining units representing more than one major geographic area of the state, the student representatives shall be from those areas. No more than three student representatives may attend meetings at any time.

History.

(§ 1 ch 148 SLA 1978)

Sec. 23.40.250.
Definitions.

In AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“collective bargaining” means the performance of the mutual obligation of the public employer or the employer’s designated representatives and the representative of the employees to meet at reasonable times, including meetings in advance of the budget making process, and negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment, or the negotiation of an agreement, or negotiation of a question arising under an agreement and the execution of a written contract incorporating an agreement reached if requested by either party, but these obligations do not compel either party to agree to a proposal or require the making of a concession;

“election” means a proceeding conducted by the labor relations agency in which the employees in a collective bargaining unit cast a secret ballot for collective bargaining representatives, or for any other purpose specified in AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

;

“labor relations agency” means the Alaska labor relations agency established in AS

23.05.360

;

“monetary terms of an agreement” means the changes in the terms and conditions of employment resulting from an agreement that

will require an appropriation for their implementation;

will result in a change in state revenues or productive work hours for state employees; or

address employee compensation, leave benefits, or health insurance benefits, whether or not an appropriation is required for implementation;

“organization” means a labor or employee organization of any kind in which employees participate and which exists for the primary purpose of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, and conditions of employment;

“public employee” means any employee of a public employer, whether or not in the classified service of the public employer, except elected or appointed officials or superintendents of schools;

“public employer” means the state or a political subdivision of the state, including without limitation, a municipality, district, school district, regional educational attendance area, board of regents, public and quasi-public corporation, housing authority, or other authority established by law, and a person designated by the public employer to act in its interest in dealing with public employees;

“regional educational attendance area” means an educational service area in the unorganized borough that may or may not include a military reservation, and that contains one or more public schools of grade levels K — 12 or any portion of those grade levels that are to be operated under the management and control of a single regional school board;

“terms and conditions of employment” means the hours of employment, the compensation and fringe benefits, and the employer’s personnel policies affecting the working conditions of the employees; but does not mean the general policies describing the function and purposes of a public employer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 113 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 10 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 77 § 3 (1990); am §§ 6 — 8 ch 1 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 15 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (4) was enacted as (8) and renumbered in 1984, at which time former paragraphs (4) — (7) were renumbered as (5) — (8). Paragraph (8) was enacted as (9) and renumbered in 1992, at which time former paragraph (8) was renumbered as (9).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2000 amendment, effective April 19, 2000, added subparagraph (4)(C) and made related stylistic changes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS

23.40.070

(2) and paragraph (9) of this section, standing alone, clearly would make both group life and health insurance benefits and retirement benefits subject to collective bargaining since they both are “fringe benefits.”
January 23, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.

Because health insurance deals with the economic interests of employees and does not deal with fundamental policy; because AS

39.30.090

, the group insurance statute, authorizes the Department of Administration to obtain “a policy or policies”; and because AS

39.30.090

does not specify what levels of coverage or benefits must be included in the policy (or policies) obtained, the issue of group life and health insurance benefits is negotiable under the Public Employment Relations Act (AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

).
January 23, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.

Given AS

39.35.120(b)

and AS

39.35.170

, which make inclusion in the public employees retirement system (AS

39.35.010

—

39.35.690

) [now AS

39.35.001

—

39.35.995

] a condition of employment for state employees and contributions to it mandatory, the conclusion is that the legislature intended the statutory provisions of the public employees retirement system to apply to all state employees, and benefits under the public employees retirement system may not be negotiated under the Public Employment Retirement Act (AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

). January 23, 1978, Op. Att’y Gen.